District of Columbia statutes.
7-2035

Licenses issued pursuant to prior law.

Except as otherwise provided by this subchapter, any child development facility licensed pursuant to the Child Development Facilities Regulation, enacted December 14, 1974 (Reg. 74-34; 29 DCMR § 300 et seq.) (“Child Development Facilities Regulation”), as amended, shall be considered licensed pursuant to this subchapter and shall be subject to renewal requirements established pursuant to this subchapter.

History

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-215, § 6, 46 DCR 274

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3625.

Temporary Addition of Section

See notes to § 7-2031.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 7-2031.